Massachusetts, session 194th, S2852.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The department of public health shall design and implement a public 
awareness campaign, subject to appropriation, to promote healthy and active lifestyles. The 
campaign shall promote subjects including, but not limited to, safe and responsible approaches to 
exercise in gyms and indoor or outdoor exercise facilities and healthy habits to improve immune, 
respiratory, and other systems of the body to support disease prevention. Promotion methods 
shall include, but not be limited to, television and website advertisements, infographic displays in 
public places, and the adoption of a memorable slogan.  
SECTION 2. The department of public health shall establish and set up on the books of 
the Commonwealth a gym membership subsidy program for the purpose of incentivizing public 
and private employers to offer free gym memberships for employees. The department shall 
design and implement an application system whereby employers may apply for partial or full 
reimbursement for the costs of offering employees free gym memberships. The department 
acting under such program shall prioritize applicants who do not contract with a health insurance 
provider that offers gym membership reimbursements.